Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-906
Polling place; supplies and equipment; designation outside precinct; standards.

(1) The election commissioner or county clerk shall provide each polling place with ballot boxes, ballot box locks and keys, and a sufficient number of voting booths furnished with supplies and conveniences to enable each registered voter to prepare his or her ballot for voting and to secretly mark his or her ballot. One voting booth shall be provided for approximately every one hundred registered voters in the precinct. The election commissioner or county clerk may increase or decrease the number of voting booths to accommodate the expected voter turnout of any election other than a statewide election.

(2) When there is no structure within the precinct suitable for use as a polling place, the election commissioner or county clerk may designate a polling place outside the precinct and convenient thereto which shall be provided with voting booths furnished with supplies and conveniences as are other polling places.

(3) Standards for polling places shall include any applicable standards developed under sections 81-5,147 and 81-5,148.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 249;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB646, § 7.